Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska47-410
Prisoner; employed or released; not agent, employee, or servant of city, county, or court.

No prisoner employed or otherwise released as provided in sections 47-401 to 47-411, while working in such employment or at any time during his release, shall be deemed an agent, employee, or servant of the city, county or court having jurisdiction over the prisoner.

Laws 1969, c. 208, § 10, p. 815.